Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,165
Alcoholic liquor; rights of person tested.

The law enforcement officer who requires a chemical test or tests pursuant to section 60-4,164 may direct whether the test or tests will be of blood or breath. The person tested shall be permitted to have a physician of his or her choice evaluate his or her condition and perform or have performed whatever laboratory tests are deemed appropriate in addition to and following the test or tests administered at the direction of the law enforcement officer. If the officer refuses to permit such additional test or tests to be taken, the original test or tests shall not be competent evidence. Upon the request of the person tested, the results of the test or tests taken at the direction of the law enforcement officer shall be made available to him or her.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 115;

Laws 1993, LB 191, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 323, § 7.